Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8261. MONTGOMERY COUNTY MUNICIPAL UTILITY

DISTRICT NO. 112

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8261.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Montgomery County Municipal Utility District No. 112.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1140 (H.B. 4104), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 8261.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a municipal utility district created under and essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1140 (H.B. 4104), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 8261.003. APPLICABILITY OF OTHER LAW. Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, the following laws apply to the district:

(1) Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code, including Subchapter J, Chapter 54, Water Code, notwithstanding the limitation on authorization based on acreage under Section 54.801 of that code; and

(2) Section 52(b)(3), Article III, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1140 (H.B. 4104), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8261.051. ROAD PROJECTS. (a) The district may construct, acquire, improve, maintain, or operate macadamized, graveled, or paved roads, or improvements in aid of those roads, inside the district.

(b) A road project must meet all applicable construction standards and regulatory ordinances of each municipality or county in whose jurisdiction the district is located.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1140 (H.B. 4104), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 8261.052. COMPLIANCE WITH MUNICIPAL CONSENT ORDINANCE OR RESOLUTION. The district shall comply with all applicable requirements of any ordinance or resolution adopted by the governing body of a municipality that consents to the creation of the district or to the inclusion of land in the district.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1140 (H.B. 4104), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER C. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8261.101. TAX TO REPAY BONDS FOR ROAD PROJECTS. The district may impose a tax to pay the principal of or interest on bonds issued under Section 8261.151.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1140 (H.B. 4104), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER D. BONDS

Sec. 8261.151. AUTHORITY TO ISSUE BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS. (a) The district may issue bonds or other obligations as provided by Chapters 49 and 51, Water Code, to finance the construction, maintenance, or operation of a project under Section 8261.051.

(b) The district may not issue bonds or other obligations to finance projects authorized by Section 8261.051 unless the issuance is approved by a vote of a two-thirds majority of the district voters, or a two-thirds majority of voters in a defined area that will benefit from the project, as provided by Subchapter J, Chapter 54, Water Code, voting at an election called for that purpose.

(c) Bonds or other obligations issued or incurred to finance projects authorized by Section 8261.051 may not exceed one-fourth of the assessed value of the real property in the district or the defined area, if applicable.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1140 (H.B. 4104), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1128 (H.B. 2590), Sec. 21, eff. September 1, 2019.